Virginia statutes. Title 4.1. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Control.
Article 2. Licenses Granted by Board; Limitations; Revocation and Suspension.
§ 4.1-209.
Wine and beer license privileges; advertising; tastings.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, persons granted a wine and beer license pursuant to §

4.1-206.3

may display within their licensed premises point-of-sale advertising materials that incorporate the use of any professional athlete or athletic team, provided that such advertising materials (i) otherwise comply with the applicable regulations of the federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco and Firearms and (ii) do not depict any athlete consuming or about to consume alcohol prior to or while engaged in an athletic activity, do not depict an athlete consuming alcohol while the athlete is operating or about to operate a motor vehicle or other machinery, and do not imply that the alcoholic beverage so advertised enhances athletic prowess.

Persons granted retail on-and-off-premises wine and beer licenses pursuant to the following provisions may conduct wine or beer tastings sponsored by the licensee for its customers for on-premises consumption:

Subdivision A 1, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, or 14 of §

4.1-206.3

;

Subdivision B 1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 7, or 8 of §

4.1-206.3

;

Subdivision C 1 or 2 of § 4.1-206.3;

Subdivision D 1 a, b, or d or 2 a of § 4.1-206.3; or

Subdivision F 4 or 5 of § 4.1-206.3.Such licensees may sell or give samples of wine and beer in designated areas at events held by the licensee for the purpose of featuring and educating the consuming public about the alcoholic beverages being tasted. Additionally, with the consent of the licensee, farm wineries, wineries, and breweries may participate in tastings held by licensees authorized to conduct tastings, including the pouring of samples to any person to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold. No single sample shall exceed four ounces of beer or two ounces of wine, and no more than 12 ounces of beer or five ounces of wine shall be given or sold to any person per day.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-25; 1952, c. 535; 1956, c. 520; 1962, c. 532; 1964, c. 210; 1970, cc. 627, 723; 1972, c. 679; 1973, c. 343; 1974, c. 267; 1975, c. 408; 1976, cc. 134, 447, 496, 703; 1977, c. 439; 1978, c. 190; 1979, c. 258; 1980, cc. 526, 528; 1981, cc. 410, 412; 1982, c. 66; 1984, c. 200; 1987, c. 365; 1988, c. 893; 1989, c. 42; 1990, c. 707; 1991, c. 628; 1992, cc. 215, 350; 1993, cc. 190, 828, 866; 1994, c. 585; 1995, cc. 544, 570; 1996, cc. 443, 604; 1997, c. 489; 2001, c. 361; 2002, c. 204; 2003, cc. 329, 589, 1029, 1030; 2004, c. 487; 2005, cc. 652, 784; 2006, cc. 94, 153, 256, 826, 845; 2007, c. 813; 2008, cc. 179, 186, 192, 875; 2010, cc. 317, 561; 2011, c. 626; 2014, cc. 125, 612; 2015, c. 412; 2016, c. 654; 2017, cc. 76, 151, 152, 153, 154, 745; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114, 1179.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1993, cc. 190 and
828 also amended former § 4-25, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to
§ 30-152, the
1993 amendments by cc. 190, 828 have been given effect in this section as set out above. In accordance with c. 190, the last sentence in subdivision 1a was added. In accordance with c. 828, the phrase “or performances immediately subsequent thereto” was inserted after “exhibitions, events” in subdivision 1 f.

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, effective January 1, 2022, deleted portions of this section and relocated them to
§

4.1-206.3

. At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the amendment by Acts
2020, c. 1179 to this section will be given effect in
§

4.1-206.3

, effective January 1, 2022.

Acts
2020, c. 1179, cl. 2 provides: “That if
§

4.1-209

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, is amended by an act of assembly passed by the 2020 Session of the General Assembly and such act consolidates the gourmet shop license into a broader retail off-premises wine and beer license, the provisions of this act shall remain in effect and shall be relocated in the subdivision of the Code of Virginia in which such retail off-premises wine and beer license is relocated.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cl. 4 provides: “That any person licensed to sell wine or beer for on-premises consumption may sell such wine or beer to persons to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold for off-premises consumption until January 1, 2022, provided that such wine or beer is sold in a (i) container upon which the original seal or closure has not been broken; (ii) growler made of glass, ceramic, metal, or other material approved by the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board); or (iii) reusable, resealable container approved by the Board. Such on-premises licensee, as well as persons licensed to sell wine or beer for off-premises consumption, may deliver wine or beer that it is authorized to sell to consumers within the Commonwealth without obtaining a delivery permit until January 1, 2022, subject to the following conditions: (a) deliveries shall be performed by (1) the licensee, (2) an agent, officer, director, shareholder, or employee of the licensee, or (3) an independent contractor of the licensee, provided that only one individual takes possession of the wine or beer during the course of the delivery and the licensee has entered into a written agreement with the independent contractor establishing that the licensee is vicariously liable for any administrative violations of this enactment or
§

4.1-304

of the Code of Virginia committed by the independent contractor relating to any deliveries made on behalf of the licensee; (b) deliveries may be made without obtaining the recipient’s signature, provided that the person making the delivery records the recipient’s full name and the method used to verify that the recipient is 21 years of age or older; (c) the delivery shall be refused when the recipient appears to be younger than 21 years of age and refuses to present valid identification; (d) the licensee shall affix a conspicuous notice in 16-point type or larger to the outside of each package of wine or beer that states ‘CONTAINS ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES; SIGNATURE OF PERSON 21 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY’ and includes the licensee number; and (e) no more than four cases of wine or beer may be delivered to any person at one time unless the licensee provides notice to the Board at least one business day prior to the delivery, which notice shall include the name and address of the intended recipient.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 361 added the subsection A designator to the introductory language, added the third sentence in subdivision A 6, and added subsection B.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 204, in subdivision A 1 f, substituted “during any event and immediately subsequent thereto” for “during the performance of professional sporting exhibitions, events or performances immediately subsequent thereto.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 329 substituted “sight-seeing boats, or special or charter boats” for “boats for which certificates as a sight-seeing carrier by boat, or a special or charter party by boat have been issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to §

46.2-2099.20

” in subdivision A 1 c.

The 2003 amendment by c. 589 rewrote clause A 1 g (ii), which formerly read: “has seating for more than 3,500 persons and is located in any county with a population between 65,000 and 70,000.”

The 2003 amendments by cc. 1029 and 1030 are identical, and in subdivision A 2, deleted “or ship” following “deliver” in the first sentence and added the last sentence; in subdivision A 5, deleted “or ship” following “deliver” in the first sentence and added the last sentence; and in subdivision A 7, deleted “or ship” following “deliver” in the first sentence and added the last sentence.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 487 added subdivision A 9.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 652 added clause (iii) to the end of the first sentence in subdivision A 1 g; and made related changes.

The 2005 amendment by c. 784, in subdivision A 6, inserted “Except as provided in §

4.1-215

” at the beginning of the second sentence, and substituted “subdivision” for “subsection” in the third sentence.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 94, in subdivision A 1 a, inserted the clause (i) designation and added clause (ii).

The 2006 amendment by c. 153, effective March 23, 2006, added the last sentence in subdivision A 1 a.

The 2006 amendment by c. 256 inserted “racetracks” in two places in the first sentence in subdivision A 1 f; in subdivision A 3, substituted “two ounces” for “one ounce” in clause (i), and substituted “four ounces” for “two ounces” in clause (ii); and added subsection C.

The 2006 amendment by c. 826 substituted “two ounces” for “one ounce” in clause (i) and “four ounces” for “two ounces” in clause (ii) of subdivision A 3.

The 2006 amendment by c. 845 deleted “and to deliver the same to purchasers in accordance with Board regulations. All such deliveries of wine or beer shall be performed by the owner or any agent, officer, director, shareholder or employee of the licensee” at the end of subdivisions 2, 5 and 7.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 813, in subdivision A 1 g, substituted “Prince William County or the City of Virginia Beach” for “any county with a population between 210,000 and 216,000 or in any city with a population between 392,000 and 394,000” in clause (i), substituted “the Counties of Albemarle, Augusta, Pittsylvania, or Rockingham, or the Cities of Charlottesville or Danville” for “any county with a population between 65,000 and 70,000 or in a city with a population between 40,000 and 47,000” in clause (ii) and substituted “Henrico County” for “any county operated under the county manager form of government” in clause (iii).

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 179, effective March 3, 2008, added the second and third sentences of subdivision A 3.

The 2008 amendment by c. 186 inserted “or Roanoke” in subdivision A 1 g and made related changes.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 192 and 875 are nearly identical, and added the last sentence of subdivision A 3. Subdivision A 3 has been set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 317 and 561 are identical, and inserted subdivisions A 10 and A 11.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 626 added subdivision A 12.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 125, in subdivision A 1 d, added the last two sentences.

The 2014 amendment by c. 612, in subdivision A 7, deleted “unchilled” following “wine and beer” and added the language beginning “and, the provisions of §

4.1-308

” to the end of the subdivision.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 412 added the last two sentences in subdivision A 1 a and inserted “Nelson” in subdivision A 1 g.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 654, added subdivision A 1 i and made related changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 76 and 153 are identical, and inserted “or in single original metal cans” in subdivisions A 1 f through A 1 h.

The 2017 amendment by c. 151 inserted the second sentence in subdivision A 6.

The 2017 amendment by c. 152 added subdivision A 1 j and made related changes.

The 2017 amendment by c. 154 inserted subsection C and redesignated former subsection C as subsection D.

The 2017 amendment by c. 745, in subdivision A 1 g, inserted “Alleghany” following “Counties of Albemarle” in clause (ii).

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1179 inserted “distillers” in subdivision A 3 in the penultimate sentence.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and deleted former subsections A and C and redesignated accordingly; in subsection A, substituted “§

4.1-206.3

” for “this section” and in subsection B in the first sentence, deleted “on-premises and” following “Persons granted retail” and substituted “the following provisions” for “this section or subsection B of §

4.1-210

,” inserted subdivisions 1 through 5, and rewrote the last two sentences as the present last sentence which former sentences read: “Samples of wine shall not exceed two ounces per person. Samples of beer shall not exceed four ounces per person.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 182, effective July 1, 2021, added clause (iii) in subdivision A 6, and made related changes.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2C M.J. Aviation, § 1.

§ 4.1-209.1.
Direct shipment of wine and beer; shipper’s license.

Holders of wine and beer shipper’s licenses issued pursuant to subdivision F 1 of §

4.1-206.3

may sell and ship not more than two cases of wine per month nor more than two cases of beer per month to any person in Virginia to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold. All such sales and shipments shall be for personal consumption only and not for resale. A case of wine shall mean any combination of packages containing not more than nine liters of wine. A case of beer shall mean any combination of packages containing not more than 288 ounces of beer. Any winery or farm winery located within or outside the Commonwealth may apply to the Board for issuance of a wine and beer shipper’s license that shall authorize the shipment of brands of wine and farm wine identified in such application. Any brewery located within or outside the Commonwealth may apply to the Board for issuance of a wine and beer shipper’s license that shall authorize the shipment of brands of beer identified in such application. Any person located within or outside the Commonwealth who is authorized to sell wine or beer at retail in their state of domicile and who is not a winery, farm winery, or brewery may nevertheless apply for a wine and beer shipper’s license if such person satisfies the requirements of this section. Any brewery, winery, or farm winery that applies for a shipper’s license or authorizes any other person, other than a retail off-premises licensee, to apply for a license to ship such brewery’s, winery’s or farm winery’s brands of wine or beer shall notify any wholesale licensees that have been authorized to distribute such brands that an application has been filed for a shipper’s license. The notice shall be in writing and in a form prescribed by the Board. The Board may adopt such regulations as it reasonably deems necessary to implement the provisions of this section, including regulations that permit the holder of a shipper’s license to amend the same by, among other things, adding or deleting any brands of wine, farm wine, or beer identified in such shipper’s license.

Any applicant for a wine and beer shipper’s license that does not own or have the right to control the distribution of the brands of wine, farm wine, or beer identified in such person’s application may be issued a shipper’s license for wine and beer, if the applicant has obtained and filed with its application for a shipper’s license, and with any subsequent application for renewal thereof, the written consent of either (i) the winery, farm winery, or brewery whose brands of wine, farm wine, or beer are identified therein or (ii) any wholesale distributor authorized to distribute the wine or beer produced by the winery, farm winery or brewery. Any winery, farm winery, or brewery, or its wholesale distributor, that has provided written authorization to a shipper licensed pursuant to this section to sell and ship its brand or brands of wine, farm wine, or beer shall not be restricted by any provision of this section from withdrawing such authorization at any time. If such authorization is withdrawn, the winery, farm winery, or brewery shall promptly notify such shipper licensee and the Board in writing of its decision to withdraw from such shipper licensee the authority to sell and ship any of its brands, whereupon such shipper licensee shall promptly file with the Board an amendment to its license eliminating any such withdrawn brand or brands from the shipper’s license.

The direct shipment of beer and wine by holders of licenses issued pursuant to subdivision F 1 of §

4.1-206.3

shall be by approved common carrier only. The Board shall develop regulations pursuant to which common carriers may apply for approval to provide common carriage of wine or beer, shipped by holders of licenses issued pursuant to subdivision F 1 of §

4.1-206.3

. Such regulations shall include provisions that require (i) the recipient to demonstrate, upon delivery, that he is at least 21 years of age; (ii) the recipient to sign an electronic or paper form or other acknowledgement of receipt as approved by the Board; and (iii) the Board-approved common carrier to submit to the Board such information as the Board may prescribe. The Board-approved common carrier shall refuse delivery when the proposed recipient appears to be under the age of 21 years and refuses to present valid identification. All licensees shipping wine or beer pursuant to this section shall affix a conspicuous notice in 16-point type or larger to the outside of each package of wine or beer shipped within or into the Commonwealth, in a conspicuous location stating: “CONTAINS ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES; SIGNATURE OF PERSON AGED 21 YEARS OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY.” Any delivery of alcoholic beverages to a minor by a common carrier shall constitute a violation by the common carrier. The common carrier and the shipper licensee shall be liable only for their independent acts.

For purposes of §§

4.1-234

and

4.1-236

and Chapter 6 (§

58.1-600

et seq.) of Title 58.1, each shipment of wine or beer by a wine and beer shipper licensee shall constitute a sale in Virginia. The licensee shall collect the taxes due to the Commonwealth and remit any excise taxes monthly to the Authority and any sales taxes to the Department of Taxation.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

4.1-203

, the holder of a wine and beer shipper license may solicit and receive applications for subscription to a wine-of-the-month or beer-of-the-month club at in-state or out-of-state locations for which a license for on-premises consumption has been issued, other than the place where the licensee carries on the business for which the license is granted. For the purposes of this subsection, “wine-of-the-month club” or “beer-of-the-month club” shall mean an agreement between an in-state or out-of-state holder of a wine and beer shipper license and a consumer in Virginia to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold that the shipper will sell and ship to the consumer and the consumer will purchase a lawful amount of wine or beer each month for an agreed term of months.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

4.1-203

, a wine and beer shipper licensee may ship wine or beer as authorized by this section through the use of the services of an approved fulfillment warehouse. For the purposes of this section, a “fulfillment warehouse” means a business operating a warehouse and providing storage, packaging, and shipping services to wineries or breweries. The Board shall develop regulations pursuant to which fulfillment warehouses may apply for approval to provide storage, packaging, and shipping services to holders of licenses issued pursuant to this section. Such regulations shall include provisions that require (i) the fulfillment warehouse to demonstrate that it is appropriately licensed for the services to be provided by the state in which its place of business is located, (ii) the Board-approved fulfillment warehouse to maintain such records and to submit to the Board such information as the Board may prescribe, and (iii) the fulfillment warehouse and each wine and beer shipper licensed under subdivision F 1 of §

4.1-206.3

to whom services are provided to enter into a contract designating the fulfillment warehouse as the agent of the shipper for purposes of complying with the provisions of this section.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

4.1-203

, a wine and beer shipper licensee may sell wine or beer as authorized by this section through the use of the services of an approved marketing portal. For the purposes of this section, a “marketing portal” means a business organized as an agricultural cooperative association under the laws of a state, soliciting and receiving orders for wine or beer and accepting and processing payment of such orders as the agent of a licensed wine and beer shipper. The Board shall develop regulations pursuant to which marketing portals may apply for approval to provide marketing services to holders of licenses issued pursuant to subdivision F 1 of §

4.1-206.3

. Such regulations shall include provisions that require (i) the marketing portal to demonstrate that it is appropriately organized as an agricultural cooperative association and licensed for the services to be provided by the state in which its place of business is located, (ii) the Board-approved marketing portal to maintain such records and to submit to the Board such information as the Board may prescribe, and (iii) the marketing portal and each wine and beer shipper licensed under this section to whom services are provided to enter into a contract designating the marketing portal as the agent of the shipper for purposes of complying with the provisions of this section.

History.

2007, cc. 99, 799; 2009, c. 292; 2010, cc. 317, 561; 2015, cc. 38, 730; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2015, cc. 38 and
730, cl. 4, as amended by Acts
2017, cc. 698 and
707, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 15, 2018, except that the provisions of the (i) thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015; (ii) third enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2018; and (iii) eleventh enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 7 provides: “That any farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery that, prior to July 1, 2016, (i) holds a valid license granted by the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board) in accordance with Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and (ii) is in compliance with the local zoning ordinance as an agricultural district or classification or as otherwise permitted by a locality for farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery use shall be allowed to continue such use as provided in
§

15.2-2307

of the Code of Virginia, notwithstanding (a) the provisions of
§

4.1-206.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, or (b) a subsequent change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016, whether by transfer, acquisition, inheritance, or other means. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may expand any existing building or structure and the uses thereof so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may construct a new building or structure so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. All such licensees shall comply with the requirements of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and Board regulations for renewal of such license or the issuance of a new license in the event of a change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 292 added subsection E.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 317 and 561 are identical, and added subsections F and G.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 38 and 730, effective January 15, 2018, are identical and substituted “Authority” for “Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control” in subsection D.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and in subsection A in the first sentence, substituted “wine and beer shipper’s licenses” for “wine shippers’ licenses and beer shippers’ licenses” and “subdivision F 1 of §

4.1-206.3

” for “this section”; and made similar changes throughout the section.

§ 4.1-210.
Repealed by Acts 2020, cc. 1113 and 1114, cl. 2, effective January 1, 2024.

History.

Former §

4.1-210

, relating to mixed beverages licenses, was derived from Acts 1968, c. 7, §§ 4-98.2, 4-98.3; 1970, cc. 119, 627; 1972, cc. 679, 691; 1974, c. 460; 1975, c. 483; 1976, cc. 700, 768; 1978, c. 153; 1980, c. 490; 1981, c. 269; 1982, c. 119; 1986, cc. 70, 374; 1987, c. 107; 1990, c. 402; 1991, c. 690; 1992, cc. 162, 215; 1993, cc. 190, 866, 910; 1998, c. 535; 2000, cc. 1036, 1047, 1051; 2001, cc. 461, 845; 2004, c. 487; 2006, c. 731; 2007, cc. 107, 126, 295, 813; 2008, c. 172; 2009, c. 322; 2012, cc. 203, 237; 2013, c. 479; 2014, cc. 125, 231, 495, 633, 638; 2015, cc. 404, 412; 2016, cc. 20, 28, 536; 2017, cc. 76, 153, 158, 585; 2018, c. 179; 2019, c. 174; 2020, cc. 15, 32, 400, 1009; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281, 282.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to mixed beverage restaurant, caterer’s licenses, annual mixed beverage special events licenses, and other retail licenses, see
§

4.1-206.3

.